Washington statutes.
RCW 27.24.066

Library rooms and service.

The county legislative authority of each county that is required to maintain a county law library shall upon demand by the board of law library trustees, provide a room suitable for the law library, with adequate heat, light, and janitor service.

[ 1992 c 62 s 5; 1933 c 167 s 3, part; RRS s 8254-7.]